Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB26.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 342.0011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) (a) "Injury" means any work-related traumatic event or series of traumatic events,
including cumulative trauma, arising out of and in the course of employment
which is the proximate cause producing a harmful change in the human
organism evidenced by objective medical findings. "Injury" does not include
the effects of the natural aging process, and does not include any
communicable disease unless the risk of contracting the disease is increased
by the nature of the employment. "Injury" when used generally, unless the
context indicates otherwise, shall include an occupational disease and damage
to a prosthetic appliance, but shall not include a psychological, psychiatric, or
stress-related change in the human organism, unless it is a direct result of a
physical injury; and
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, "injury" for a:
1. Police officer, firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel as
defined in KRS 61.315;
2. Front-line staff as defined in KRS 194A.065; or
3. Kentucky National Guard member on state active duty as defined in
KRS 38.010;
may include a psychological, psychiatric, or stress-related change in the
human organism that is not a direct result of a physical injury, as specified
in Section 2 of this Act;
(2) "Occupational disease" means a disease arising out of and in the course of the
employment;
(3) An occupational disease as defined in this chapter shall be deemed to arise out of
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
the employment if there is apparent to the rational mind, upon consideration of all
the circumstances, a causal connection between the conditions under which the
work is performed and the occupational disease, and which can be seen to have
followed as a natural incident to the work as a result of the exposure occasioned by
the nature of the employment and which can be fairly traced to the employment as
the proximate cause. The occupational disease shall be incidental to the character of
the business and not independent of the relationship of employer and employee. An
occupational disease need not have been foreseen or expected but, after its
contraction, it must appear to be related to a risk connected with the employment
and to have flowed from that source as a rational consequence;
(4) "Injurious exposure" shall mean that exposure to occupational hazard which would,
independently of any other cause whatsoever, produce or cause the disease for
which the claim is made;
(5) "Death" means death resulting from an injury or occupational disease;
(6) "Carrier" means any insurer, or legal representative thereof, authorized to insure the
liability of employers under this chapter and includes a self-insurer;
(7) "Self-insurer" is an employer who has been authorized under the provisions of this
chapter to carry his or her own liability on his or her employees covered by this
chapter;
(8) "Department" means the Department of Workers' Claims in the Education and
Labor Cabinet;
(9) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workers' Claims
under the direction and supervision of the secretary of the Education and Labor
Cabinet;
(10) "Board" means the Workers' Compensation Board;
(11) (a) "Temporary total disability" means the condition of an employee who has not
reached maximum medical improvement from an injury and has not reached a
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
level of improvement that would permit a return to employment.[;]
(b) "Permanent partial disability" means the condition of an employee who, due
to an injury, has a permanent disability rating but retains the ability to work.[;
and]
(c) "Permanent total disability" means the condition of an employee who, due to
an injury, has a permanent disability rating and has a complete and permanent
inability to perform any type of work as a result of an injury, except that total
disability shall be irrebuttably presumed to exist for an injury that results in:
1. Total and permanent loss of sight in both eyes;
2. Loss of both feet at or above the ankle;
3. Loss of both hands at or above the wrist;
4. Loss of one (1) foot at or above the ankle and the loss of one (1) hand at
or above the wrist;
5. Permanent and complete paralysis of both arms, both legs, or one (1)
arm and one (1) leg;
6. Incurable insanity or imbecility; or
7. Total loss of hearing;
(12) "Income benefits" means payments made under the provisions of this chapter to the
disabled worker or his or her dependents in case of death, excluding medical and
related benefits;
(13) "Medical and related benefits" means payments made for medical, hospital, burial,
and other services as provided in this chapter, other than income benefits;
(14) "Compensation" means all payments made under the provisions of this chapter
representing the sum of income benefits and medical and related benefits;
(15) "Medical services" means medical, surgical, dental, hospital, nursing, and medical
rehabilitation services, medicines, and fittings for artificial or prosthetic devices;
(16) "Person" means any individual, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
company, firm, association, trust, joint venture, corporation, or legal representative
thereof;
(17) "Wages" means, in addition to money payments for services rendered, the
reasonable value of board, rent, housing, lodging, fuel, or similar advantages
received from the employer, and gratuities received in the course of employment
from persons other than the employer as evidenced by the employee's federal and
state tax returns;
(18) "Agriculture" means the operation of farm premises, including the planting,
cultivation, producing, growing, harvesting, and preparation for market of
agricultural or horticultural commodities thereon, the raising of livestock for food
products and for racing purposes, and poultry thereon, and any work performed as
an incident to or in conjunction with the farm operations, including the sale of
produce at on-site markets and the processing of produce for sale at on-site markets.
It shall not include the commercial processing, packing, drying, storing, or canning
of such commodities for market, or making cheese or butter or other dairy products
for market;
(19) "Beneficiary" means any person who is entitled to income benefits or medical and
related benefits under this chapter;
(20) "United States," when used in a geographic sense, means the several states, the
District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Canal Zone, and the
territories of the United States;
(21) "Alien" means a person who is not a citizen, a national, or a resident of the United
States or Canada. Any person not a citizen or national of the United States who
relinquishes or is about to relinquish his or her residence in the United States shall
be regarded as an alien;
(22) "Insurance carrier" means every insurance carrier or insurance company authorized
to do business in the Commonwealth writing workers' compensation insurance
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
coverage and includes the Kentucky Employers Mutual Insurance Authority and
every self-insured group operating under the provisions of this chapter;
(23) (a) "Severance or processing of coal" means all activities performed in the
Commonwealth at underground, auger, and surface mining sites; all activities
performed at tipple or processing plants that clean, break, size, or treat coal;
and all activities performed at coal loading facilities for trucks, railroads, and
barges. Severance or processing of coal shall not include acts performed by a
final consumer if the acts are performed at the site of final consumption.
(b) "Engaged in severance or processing of coal" shall include all individuals,
partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations,
joint ventures, associations, or any other business entity in the Commonwealth
which has employees on its payroll who perform any of the acts stated in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, regardless of whether the acts are performed
as owner of the coal or on a contract or fee basis for the actual owner of the
coal. A business entity engaged in the severance or processing of coal,
including but not limited to administrative or selling functions, shall be
considered wholly engaged in the severance or processing of coal for the
purpose of this chapter. However, a business entity which is engaged in a
separate business activity not related to coal, for which a separate premium
charge is not made, shall be deemed to be engaged in the severance or
processing of coal only to the extent that the number of employees engaged in
the severance or processing of coal bears to the total number of employees.
Any employee who is involved in the business of severing or processing of
coal and business activities not related to coal shall be prorated based on the
time involved in severance or processing of coal bears to his or her total time;
(24) "Premium" for every self-insured group means any and all assessments levied on its
members by such group or contributed to it by the members thereof. For special
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
fund assessment purposes, "premium" also includes any and all membership dues,
fees, or other payments by members of the group to associations or other entities
used for underwriting, claims handling, loss control, premium audit, actuarial, or
other services associated with the maintenance or operation of the self-insurance
group;
(25) (a) "Premiums received" for policies effective on or after January 1, 1994, for
insurance companies means direct written premiums as reported in the annual
statement to the Department of Insurance by insurance companies, except that
"premiums received" includes premiums charged off or deferred, and, on
insurance policies or other evidence of coverage with provisions for
deductibles, the calculated cost for coverage, including experience
modification and premium surcharge or discount, prior to any reduction for
deductibles. The rates, factors, and methods used to calculate the cost for
coverage under this paragraph for insurance policies or other evidence of
coverage with provisions for deductibles shall be the same rates, factors, and
methods normally used by the insurance company in Kentucky to calculate
the cost for coverage for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage
without provisions for deductibles, except that, for insurance policies or other
evidence of coverage with provisions for deductibles effective on or after
January 1, 1995, the calculated cost for coverage shall not include any
schedule rating modification, debits, or credits. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates on or after January 1, 1995, assessments
shall be imposed on premiums received as calculated by the deductible
program adjustment. The cost for coverage calculated under this paragraph by
insurance companies that issue only deductible insurance policies in Kentucky
shall be actuarially adequate to cover the entire liability of the employer for
compensation under this chapter, including all expenses and allowances
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
normally used to calculate the cost for coverage. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates of May 6, 1993, through December 31,
1993, for which the insurance company did not report premiums and remit
special fund assessments based on the calculated cost for coverage prior to the
reduction for deductibles, "premiums received" includes the initial premium
plus any reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, and fees charged
under the deductibles. The special fund assessment rates in effect for
reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, or fees charged under the
deductibles shall be those percentages in effect on the effective date of the
insurance policy. For policies covering covered employees having a co-
employment relationship with a professional employer organization and a
client as defined in KRS Chapter 336, "premiums received" means premiums
calculated using the experience modification factor of each client as defined
in KRS Chapter 336 for each covered employee for that portion of the payroll
pertaining to the covered employee.
(b) "Direct written premium" for insurance companies means the gross premium
written less return premiums and premiums on policies not taken but
including policy and membership fees.
(c) "Premium," for policies effective on or after January 1, 1994, for insurance
companies means all consideration, whether designated as premium or
otherwise, for workers' compensation insurance paid to an insurance company
or its representative, including, on insurance policies with provisions for
deductibles, the calculated cost for coverage, including experience
modification and premium surcharge or discount, prior to any reduction for
deductibles. The rates, factors, and methods used to calculate the cost for
coverage under this paragraph for insurance policies or other evidence of
coverage with provisions for deductibles shall be the same rates, factors, and
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
methods normally used by the insurance company in Kentucky to calculate
the cost for coverage for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage
without provisions for deductibles, except that, for insurance policies or other
evidence of coverage with provisions for deductibles effective on or after
January 1, 1995, the calculated cost for coverage shall not include any
schedule rating modifications, debits, or credits. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates on or after January 1, 1995, assessments
shall be imposed as calculated by the deductible program adjustment. The cost
for coverage calculated under this paragraph by insurance companies that
issue only deductible insurance policies in Kentucky shall be actuarially
adequate to cover the entire liability of the employer for compensation under
this chapter, including all expenses and allowances normally used to calculate
the cost for coverage. For policies with provisions for deductibles with
effective dates of May 6, 1993, through December 31, 1993, for which the
insurance company did not report premiums and remit special fund
assessments based on the calculated cost for coverage prior to the reduction
for deductibles, "premium" includes the initial consideration plus any
reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, or fees charged under the
deductibles.
(d) "Return premiums" for insurance companies means amounts returned to
insureds due to endorsements, retrospective adjustments, cancellations,
dividends, or errors.
(e) "Deductible program adjustment" means calculating premium and premiums
received on a gross basis without regard to the following:
1. Schedule rating modifications, debits, or credits;
2. Deductible credits; or
3. Modifications to the cost of coverage from inception through and
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
including any audit that are based on negotiated retrospective rating
arrangements, including but not limited to large risk alternative rating
options;
(26) "Insurance policy" for an insurance company or self-insured group means the term
of insurance coverage commencing from the date coverage is extended, whether a
new policy or a renewal, through its expiration, not to exceed the anniversary date
of the renewal for the following year;
(27) "Self-insurance year" for a self-insured group means the annual period of
certification of the group created pursuant to KRS 342.350(4) and 304.50-010;
(28) "Premium" for each employer carrying his or her own risk pursuant to KRS
342.340(1) shall be the projected value of the employer's workers' compensation
claims for the next calendar year as calculated by the commissioner using
generally-accepted actuarial methods as follows:
(a) The base period shall be the earliest three (3) calendar years of the five (5)
calendar years immediately preceding the calendar year for which the
calculation is made. The commissioner shall identify each claim of the
employer which has an injury date or date of last injurious exposure to the
cause of an occupational disease during each one (1) of the three (3) calendar
years to be used as the base, and shall assign a value to each claim. The value
shall be the total of the indemnity benefits paid to date and projected to be
paid, adjusted to current benefit levels, plus the medical benefits paid to date
and projected to be paid for the life of the claim, plus the cost of medical and
vocational rehabilitation paid to date and projected to be paid. Adjustment to
current benefit levels shall be done by multiplying the weekly indemnity
benefit for each claim by the number obtained by dividing the statewide
average weekly wage which will be in effect for the year for which the
premium is being calculated by the statewide average weekly wage in effect
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
during the year in which the injury or date of the last exposure occurred. The
total value of the claims using the adjusted weekly benefit shall then be
calculated by the commissioner. Values for claims in which awards have been
made or settlements reached because of findings of permanent partial or
permanent total disability shall be calculated using the mortality and interest
discount assumptions used in the latest available statistical plan of the
advisory rating organization defined in Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 304. The
sum of all calculated values shall be computed for all claims in the base
period;
(b) The commissioner shall obtain the annual payroll for each of the three (3)
years in the base period for each employer carrying his or her own risk from
records of the department and from the records of the Department of
Workforce Development, Education and Labor Cabinet. The commissioner
shall multiply each of the three (3) years of payroll by the number obtained by
dividing the statewide average weekly wage which will be in effect for the
year in which the premium is being calculated by the statewide average
weekly wage in effect in each of the years of the base period;
(c) The commissioner shall divide the total of the adjusted claim values for the
three (3) year base period by the total adjusted payroll for the same three (3)
year period. The value so calculated shall be multiplied by 1.25 and shall then
be multiplied by the employer's most recent annualized payroll, calculated
using records of the department and the Department of Workforce
Development data which shall be made available for this purpose on a
quarterly basis as reported, to obtain the premium for the next calendar year
for assessment purposes under KRS 342.122;
(d) For November 1, 1987, through December 31, 1988, premium for each
employer carrying its own risk shall be an amount calculated by the board
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
pursuant to the provisions contained in this subsection and such premium
shall be provided to each employer carrying its own risk and to the funding
commission on or before January 1, 1988. Thereafter, the calculations set
forth in this subsection shall be performed annually, at the time each employer
applies or renews its application for certification to carry its own risk for the
next twelve (12) month period and submits payroll and other data in support
of the application. The employer and the funding commission shall be notified
at the time of the certification or recertification of the premium calculated by
the commissioner, which shall form the employer's basis for assessments
pursuant to KRS 342.122 for the calendar year beginning on January 1
following the date of certification or recertification;
(e) If an employer having fewer than five (5) years of doing business in this state
applies to carry its own risk and is so certified, its premium for the purposes
of KRS 342.122 shall be based on the lesser number of years of experience as
may be available including the two (2) most recent years if necessary to create
a three (3) year base period. If the employer has less than two (2) years of
operation in this state available for the premium calculation, then its premium
shall be the greater of the value obtained by the calculation called for in this
subsection or the amount of security required by the commissioner pursuant to
KRS 342.340(1);
(f) If an employer is certified to carry its own risk after having previously insured
the risk, its premium shall be calculated using values obtained from claims
incurred while insured for as many of the years of the base period as may be
necessary to create a full three (3) year base. After the employer is certified to
carry its own risk and has paid all amounts due for assessments upon
premiums paid while insured, the employer shall be assessed only upon the
premium calculated under this subsection;
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
(g) "Premium" for each employer defined in KRS 342.630(2) shall be calculated
as set forth in this subsection; and
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, the premium of any
employer authorized to carry its own risk for purposes of assessments due
under this chapter shall be no less than thirty cents ($0.30) per one hundred
dollars ($100) of the employer's most recent annualized payroll for employees
covered by this chapter;
(29) "SIC code" as used in this chapter means the Standard Industrial Classification
Code contained in the latest edition of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual
published by the Federal Office of Management and Budget;
(30) "Investment interest" means any pecuniary or beneficial interest in a provider of
medical services or treatment under this chapter, other than a provider in which that
pecuniary or investment interest is obtained on terms equally available to the public
through trading on a registered national securities exchange, such as the New York
Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange, or on the National Association
of Securities Dealers Automated Quotation System;
(31) "Managed health care system" means a health care system that employs gatekeeper
providers, performs utilization review, and does medical bill audits;
(32) "Physician" means physicians and surgeons, audiologists holding a doctorate in
audiology, psychologists, optometrists, dentists, podiatrists, and osteopathic and
chiropractic practitioners acting within the scope of the license or other credentials
required by his or her specialty of practice in the United States jurisdiction in which
he or she is authorized to practice;
(33) "Objective medical findings" means information gained through direct observation
and testing of the patient applying objective or standardized methods;
(34) "Work" means providing services to another in return for remuneration on a regular
and sustained basis in a competitive economy;
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
(35) "Permanent impairment rating" means percentage of whole body impairment
caused by the injury or occupational disease as determined by the "Guides to the
Evaluation of Permanent Impairment";
(36) "Permanent disability rating" means the permanent impairment rating selected by
an administrative law judge times the factor set forth in the table that appears at
KRS 342.730(1)(b); and
(37) "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment" means, except as provided in
KRS 342.262:
(a) The fifth edition published by the American Medical Association; and
(b) For psychological impairments, Chapter 12 of the second edition published by
the American Medical Association.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 342 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the same meaning as in KRS
61.315;
(b) "Firefighter" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.315;
(c) "Front-line staff" has the same meaning as in KRS 194A.065;
(d) "Kentucky National Guard member" means a member on state active duty
as defined in KRS 38.010;
(e) "Police officer" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.315; and
(f) "Qualified mental health professional" has the same meaning as in KRS
202A.011.
(2) If a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical services personnel, front-line
staff member, or a Kentucky National Guard member suffers a psychological,
psychiatric, or stress-related change in the human organism that is not a direct
result of a physical injury but is the result of a work-related event or cumulative
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 254
work-related stress, then that psychological, psychiatric, or stress-related change
shall be considered an injury arising out of and in the course of employment if it
is demonstrated by the preponderance of the evidence that:
(a) The work-related event or cumulative work-related stress was extraordinary
and unusual in comparison to pressures and tensions experienced by the
average employee across all occupations; and
(b) The work-related event or cumulative work-related stress, and not some
other event, was the proximate cause of the psychological, psychiatric, or
stress-related change in the human organism.
(3) A psychological, psychiatric, or stress-related change in the human organism
shall not be considered an injury arising out of and in the course of employment
if it results from any disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff,
demotion, termination, or similar action taken in good faith by the employer.
(4) (a) If a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical services personnel, front-
line staff member, or a Kentucky National Guard member is diagnosed with
post-traumatic stress disorder by a qualified mental health professional
within three (3) years of the last active date of employment as a police
officer, firefighter, emergency medical services personnel, front-line staff
member, or Kentucky National Guard member, then there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the post-traumatic stress disorder is an injury
covered by this chapter, and the employer with whom the employee was last
injuriously exposed to the harmful stress shall be exclusively liable for
benefits.
(b) A presumption of a work-related injury under paragraph (a) of this
subsection may be overcome by the preponderance of the evidence that the
post-traumatic stress disorder was caused by nonservice-connected risk
factors or nonservice-connected exposure.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 9/29/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed